Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.120

Registration of securities—Marketing of securities—Listing of shares on securities exchange or NASDAQ quotation system.

A converted savings bank or holding company formed under chapter 32.34 RCW shall:

(1) Promptly following its conversion register the securities issued in connection therewith pursuant to the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 and undertake not to deregister the securities for a period of three years thereafter;

(2) Use its best efforts to encourage and assist a market maker to establish and maintain a market for the securities issued in connection with the conversion; and

(3) Use its best efforts to list those shares issued in connection with the conversion on a national or regional securities exchange or on the NASDAQ quotation system.

[ 1985 c 56 s 19; 1981 c 85 s 23.]